Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. ORGANIZATION OF COUNTY GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. COMMISSIONERS COURT AND COUNTY OFFICERS

CHAPTER 82. COUNTY CLERK

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 82.001. SURETY BOND AND OATH OF COUNTY CLERK; SELF-INSURANCE. (a) The county clerk must, before beginning to perform the duties of office, execute a bond either with four or more good and sufficient sureties or with a surety company authorized to do business in the state as a surety.

(b) In lieu of the clerk obtaining the bond, the county may self-insure against losses that would have been covered by the bond.

(c) The bond must be:

(1) approved by the commissioners court;

(2) made payable to the county;

(3) conditioned that the clerk will faithfully perform the duties of office; and

(4) in an amount equal to at least 20 percent of the maximum amount of fees collected in any year during the term of office preceding the term for which the bond is to be given, but not less than $5,000 or more than $500,000.

(d) The clerk must take and subscribe the official oath, which must be endorsed on the bond if the bond is required. The bond and oath shall be recorded in the county clerk's office and deposited in the office of the clerk of the district court.

(e) An injured party in a suit to which the county is a party may use and enter in the record in the suit a certified copy of the bond.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 9(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 82.002. SURETY BOND ON DEPUTY CLERKS AND EMPLOYEES; SELF-INSURANCE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the county clerk shall execute one or more surety bonds in accordance with this section to cover each deputy clerk or other employee. The county clerk shall execute:

(1) an individual bond for each deputy clerk and other employee in an amount for each bond that is equal to the county clerk's bond; or

(2) a schedule surety bond or a blanket surety bond to cover all deputy clerks and all other employees in a total amount that is equal to the county clerk's bond.

(b) In lieu of a clerk obtaining a bond as required by Subsection (a), the county may self-insure against losses that would have been covered by the bond.

(c) A bond covering a deputy clerk or other employee must be conditioned in the same manner as the county clerk's bond. A bond covering a deputy clerk or other employee must be made payable to the county for the use and benefit of the county clerk.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 9(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 179 (H.B. 1494), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 82.003. ERRORS AND OMISSIONS INSURANCE; CONTINGENCY FUND. (a) The county clerk shall obtain an insurance policy or similar coverage from a governmental pool operating under Chapter 119 covering the clerk and each deputy clerk against liability incurred through errors and omissions in the performance of their official duties.

(b) The policy or other coverage document must be in an amount equal to the maximum amount of fees collected in any year during the term of office preceding the term for which the policy is to be obtained. However, the policy or other coverage document must be in an amount of at least $10,000 but is not required to exceed $500,000. If the policy or other coverage document provides coverage for other county officials, the policy or other coverage document must be in an amount of at least $1 million.

(c) The commissioners court may establish a contingency fund to provide the coverage required by this section if it is determined by the county clerk that insurance coverage is unavailable at a reasonable cost.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 9(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.01, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 82.004. PREMIUMS. The commissioners court of a county shall pay out of the general fund of the county the premiums for a bond or insurance policy required by this chapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 82.005. APPOINTMENT, OATH, AND POWERS OF DEPUTY CLERK. (a) An appointment by the county clerk of a deputy clerk must be in writing, be signed by the county clerk, and bear the seal of the county court. The county clerk shall record the appointment in the county clerk's office and shall deposit it in the office of the district clerk.

(b) A deputy clerk must take the official oath.

(c) A deputy clerk acts in the name of the county clerk and may perform all official acts that the county clerk may perform.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. MISCELLANEOUS POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 82.051. ELECTRONIC DISPLAY OF OFFICIAL AND LEGAL NOTICES BY COUNTY CLERK. (a) In this section, "electronic display" includes a display:

(1) by the use of an electronic kiosk, electronic bulletin board, or other similar device designed to provide readily accessible information; or

(2) on a county's public Internet website.

(b) A county clerk may post an official and legal notice by electronic display instead of posting a physical document. An electronic display of information posted under this section using a device described by Subsection (a)(1) must meet the location, time, and accessibility requirements provided by law for the posting of the notice. An electronic display of information posted under this section on a county's public Internet website must meet the time requirements provided by law for the posting of the notice.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (H.B. 3601), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.